Washington statutes.
RCW 11.60.060

Procedure on death of person entitled to performance.

If the person entitled to performance shall die before the commencement of the proceedings according to the provisions of this title or before the completion of performance, any person who would have been entitled to the performance under him or her, as heir, devisee, or otherwise, in case the performance had been made according to the terms of the contract, or the personal representative of such deceased person, for the benefit of persons entitled, may commence such proceedings, or prosecute the same if already commenced; and the performance shall inure to the persons who would have been entitled to it, or to the personal representative for their benefit.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2053; 1965 c 145 s 11.60.060. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 193; RRS s 1563; prior: 1891 c 155 s 47; Code 1881 s 532; 1877 p 132 s 635; 1854 p 294 s 159.]